Washington statutes.
RCW 15.49.410

"Stop sale, use or removal orders"—Seizure—Condemnation.

(1) When the department has determined or has probable cause to suspect that any lot of seed or screenings is mislabeled and/or is being distributed in violation of this chapter or regulations adopted hereunder, it may issue and enforce a written or printed "stop sale, use or removal order" warning the distributor not to dispose of the lot of seed or screenings in any manner until written permission is given by the department or a court of competent jurisdiction. The department shall release the lot of seed or screenings so withdrawn when said provisions and regulations have been complied with. If compliance is not obtained, the department may bring proceedings for condemnation.

(2) Any lot of seed or screenings not in compliance with the provisions of this chapter shall be subject to seizure on complaint of the department to a court of competent jurisdiction in the locality in which the seed or screenings are located. In the event the court finds the seed or screenings to be in violation of this chapter and orders the condemnation of said seed or screenings, such lot of seed or screenings shall be denatured, conditioned, destroyed, relabeled, or otherwise disposed of in compliance with the laws of this state: PROVIDED, That in no instance shall the court order such disposition of said seed or screenings without first having given the claimant an opportunity to apply to the court, within twenty days, for the release of said seed or screenings or for permission to condition or relabel it to bring it into compliance with this chapter.

[ 1981 c 297 s 16; 1969 c 63 s 41.]

NOTES:

Severability—1981 c 297: See note following RCW 15.36.201.